Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 4. EMPLOYMENT SERVICES AND UNEMPLOYMENT

SUBTITLE A. TEXAS UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION ACT

CHAPTER 210. BACK PAY AWARDS; LOST OR MISPLACED WARRANTS

SUBCHAPTER A. BACK PAY AWARDS

Sec. 210.001. NOTICE OF BACK PAY AWARD REDUCTION. If a back pay award to a claimant is reduced because of the receipt of unemployment compensation benefits by the claimant, the employer against whom the back pay award was made shall notify the commission of the back pay award in writing not later than the 12th day after the date on which the employer learns about the reduction.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 210.002. REIMBURSEMENT BY EMPLOYER FOR REDUCTION OF BACK PAY AWARD. (a) Subject to Subsection (b), an employer who is assessed a back pay award that is reduced because of the receipt of unemployment compensation benefits by the claimant shall reimburse the compensation fund for benefits paid from the compensation fund in an amount equal to the amount of the reduction in the back pay award.

(b) An employer is not liable under this section to pay more than the amount that the commission determines the claimant was overpaid unemployment compensation benefits because of the back pay award.

(c) An employer shall reimburse the compensation fund as provided by rules adopted by the commission.

(d) The commission shall credit the payment of reimbursement by an employer against the overpayment of benefits.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 210.003. EMPLOYEE'S LIABILITY; SOLE LIABILITY OF EMPLOYER. A claimant is not liable for an overpayment of benefits that results from a back pay award and for which the employer against whom the award is made is required under Section 210.002 to reimburse the compensation fund, and the employer's liability is the only liability because of the overpayment. This section prevails over any conflicting provision of this subtitle.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER B. LOST OR MISPLACED WARRANTS

Sec. 210.011. REPLACEMENT FOR LOST OR MISPLACED WARRANT. (a) The comptroller may issue to a claimant a replacement warrant for a warrant issued in payment of benefits under this subtitle if the claimant who was entitled to receive the original warrant:

(1) loses or for any reason fails to receive the warrant; and

(2) furnishes satisfactory proof to the comptroller of the loss or failure to receive the warrant.

(b) Subject to Section 210.013, the replacement warrant shall be issued as provided by Section 403.054, Government Code.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 9.36(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 210.012. DEADLINE FOR PAYMENT OF WARRANT. The comptroller may not pay a warrant issued for benefits unless the warrant is presented for payment before the first anniversary of the date on which the warrant was issued.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 9.36(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1423, Sec. 12.11, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 210.013. DEADLINE FOR ISSUANCE OF REPLACEMENT WARRANT. A replacement warrant may not be issued under this chapter after the first anniversary of the date of the original warrant.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 9.36(c), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.